Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1036.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 28B.50.100 and 2013 c 23 s 58 are each amended to read as follows:(1) There is hereby created a board of trustees for each college district as set forth in this chapter. Each board of trustees shall be composed of five trustees, except as provided in RCW 28B.50.102, who shall be appointed by the governor for terms commencing October 1st of the year in which appointed. In making such appointments, the governor shall give consideration to geographical diversity, and representing labor, business, women, and racial and ethnic minorities, in the membership of the boards of trustees. The boards of trustees for districts ((containing technical colleges)) shall include at least one member from business and one member from labor.(2) The successors of the trustees initially appointed shall be appointed by the governor to serve for a term of five years except that any person appointed to fill a vacancy occurring prior to the expiration of any term shall be appointed only for the remainder of the term. Each member shall serve until a successor is appointed and qualified.(3) Every trustee shall be a resident and qualified elector of the college district. No trustee may be an employee of the community and technical college system, a member of the board of directors of any school district, or a member of the governing board of any public or private educational institution.(4) Each board of trustees shall organize itself by electing a chair from its members. The board shall adopt a seal and may adopt such bylaws, rules, and regulations as it deems necessary for its own government. Three members of the board shall constitute a quorum, but a lesser number may adjourn from time to time and may compel the attendance of absent members in such manner as prescribed in its bylaws, rules, or regulations. The district president, or if there be none, the president of the college, shall serve as, or may designate another person to serve as, the secretary of the board, who shall not be deemed to be a member of the board.(5) Each board of trustees shall follow procedures for open public meetings in chapter 42.30 RCW. Each board shall provide time for public comment at each meeting.(6) Members of the boards of trustees may be removed for misconduct or malfeasance in office in the manner provided by RCW 28B.10.500.(7) The college board may adopt rules to clarify the appointment process for districts.Sec. 2. RCW 28B.35.100 and 2006 c 78 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The governance of each of the regional universities shall be vested in a board of trustees consisting of eight members, one of whom shall be a student and one of whom shall be a member from labor. No trustee may be an employee of the higher education system, a member of the board of directors of any institution of higher education, or a member of the governing board of any public or private educational institution. The governor shall select the student member from a list of candidates, of at least three and not more than five, submitted by the governing body of the associated students. They shall be appointed by the governor with the consent of the senate and, except for the student member, shall hold their offices for a term of six years from the first day of October and until their successors are appointed and qualified. The student member shall hold his or her office for a term of one year from the first day of July and until the first day of July of the following year or until his or her successor is appointed and qualified, whichever is later. The student member shall be a full-time student in good standing at the respective university at the time of appointment.(2) Five members of the board constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. In case of a vacancy, or when an appointment is made after the date of expiration of the term, the governor shall fill the vacancy for the remainder of the term of the trustee whose office has become vacant or expired.(3) Except for the term of the student member, no more than the terms of two members will expire simultaneously on the last day of September in any one year.(4) A student appointed under this section shall excuse himself or herself from participation or voting on matters relating to the hiring, discipline, or tenure of faculty members and personnel.Sec. 3. RCW 28B.40.100 and 2006 c 78 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The governance of The Evergreen State College shall be vested in a board of trustees consisting of eight members, one of whom shall be a student and one of whom shall be a member from labor. No trustee may be an employee of the higher education system, a member of the board of directors of any institution of higher education, or a member of the governing board of any public or private educational institution. The governor shall select the student member from a list of candidates, of at least three and not more than five, submitted by the student body. They shall be appointed by the governor with the consent of the senate and, except for the student member, shall hold their offices for a term of six years from the first day of October and until their successors are appointed and qualified. The student member shall hold his or her office for a term of one year from the first day of July and until the first day of July of the following year or until his or her successor is appointed and qualified, whichever is later. The student member shall be a full-time student in good standing at the college at the time of appointment.(2) Five members of the board constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. In case of a vacancy, or when an appointment is made after the date of expiration of the term, the governor shall fill the vacancy for the remainder of the term of the trustee whose office has become vacant or expired.(3) Except for the term of the student member, no more than the terms of two members will expire simultaneously on the last day of September in any one year.(4) A student appointed under this section shall excuse himself or herself from participation or voting on matters relating to the hiring, discipline, or tenure of faculty members and personnel.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. This act takes effect October 1, 2030.--- END ---